Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 3 Division of Arkansas Heritage
(1)Prior to the commencement of budget hearings conducted by the Legislative Council, the Director of the Division of Information Systems shall prepare an operating budget indicating the amount of money that will be required to operate the Division of Information Systems each year of the succeeding biennium.

(1)When the General Assembly has completed the appropriation process, the director shall oversee budgetary planning for the division for each fiscal year of the biennium.

Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State upon the written application of the division and review by the Legislative Council, in order to effect compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions:

The director shall adjust rates for services or issue billing adjustments as necessary; or

Funds sufficient to effect compliance shall be provided to the division.

Rates shall be reviewed by the division on no less than an annual basis in order to ensure compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” twice in (a)(1); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Governor” in (b)(2).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in the section heading, (a), (c), and twice in (e); substituted “division” for “department” at the end of (c); and substituted “division” for “Department of Information Systems” in (d) and (e).

The quarterly allotment procedures applicable to state agencies, as defined by the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, § 19-4-101 et seq., shall be applicable to all appropriations funded directly through general revenue.

(1)Prior to June 30 of each even-numbered year, the Legislative Council shall conduct a review of the state budget, purchasing, and personnel process used by state agencies regarding information technology.

All agencies of the executive branch shall cooperate fully with the Legislative Council to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The Division of Information Systems shall make recommendations regarding revisions to the state budget, purchasing, and personnel process related to information technology to the Legislative Council by March 1 of each even-numbered year.

There is created and established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Department of Finance and Administration the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund.

The Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund shall consist of nonrevenue receipts derived from services provided to various agencies of the federal, state, city, and county governments, and any other moneys which may be provided by law for credit to the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund.

All revenues received by the Division of Information Systems for providing information technology services shall be deposited into the State Treasury as nonrevenue receipts, there to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the division.

All revenues received from agencies or other governmental entities for information technology services provided by contracts between the division and outside vendors may be deposited into the State Treasury as refund to expenditures.

Subject to the written approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State upon written application of the division and review by the Legislative Council, the Director of the Division of Information Systems shall have the authority to transfer funds between the Information Technology Reserve Fund established by §§ 19-5-1056 and 25-4-123 and the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund established under this section for cash management purposes.

(1)The Division of Information Systems is authorized to accumulate a reserve for equipment acquisition in an amount not to exceed the division's depreciation expense per fiscal year.

These loans and the reserve for equipment acquisition shall be used exclusively for major equipment acquisitions or improvements of information technology required in order to fulfill the requirements for one (1) or more user agencies.

The loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to the Information Technology Reserve Fund shall be repaid within five (5) years from revenues derived from charges to users, and the annual loan repayment amount shall be computed as a part of the total yearly expenses of the division and shall be charged proportionately to users.

(1)(A)However, before the board approves any requests for loans by the division authorized in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the requests shall be submitted to the Governor for his or her approval after the Governor has first obtained the advice of the Legislative Council in regard thereto.

After having obtained advice, the Governor may in writing approve or reject the request.

However, if the Legislative Council fails to give its written advice or opinion to the Governor within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the request for loans, the Governor may proceed to act on the matter without the advice of the Legislative Council.

The board shall make no loans if the approval of the Governor has not been obtained therefor.

After obtaining the Governor's approval in writing, the board shall also review and may approve the loans and establish terms of repayment and a rate of interest to be paid by the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund. The rate shall be approximately equivalent to the rate of interest the board is receiving on other investments at the time of approving the loan request.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a)(1); substituted “division’s” and “division” for “department’s” and “department” in (a)(1), (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(C), and (b)(1)(A); and substituted “Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund” for “Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund” in (b)(3).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund” for “Department of Information Systems Revolving Fund” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a) and (b)(1)-(2); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b)(2) and in (c).

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Information Technology Reserve Fund”.

This fund shall consist of those funds transferred from the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund in an amount up to the authorized reserve for equipment acquisition as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State within thirty (30) days following the closing of each fiscal year, any loans which may be received from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund, and any other moneys which may be provided by law, there to be used exclusively for major equipment acquisitions or improvements as set out in § 25-4-122.

Within sixty (60) days following the final closing entries for the consolidated annual financial report for each fiscal year, the Director of the Division of Information Systems shall obtain from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the written approval of a plan that shall include a proposed methodology to make all appropriate adjustments to effect compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions for the fiscal year.

(1)If the plan under subsection (a) of this section requires appropriate credits or debits to customer accounts to effect compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions, the Division of Information Systems shall make any adjustments within sixty (60) days after approval of the plan.

In the event that the customer has an unpaid account balance due the division, the customer's credit shall be withheld until the account balance is satisfied.

The Governor shall designate the State Broadband Manager.

The State Broadband Manager shall coordinate the state's efforts to expand and improve broadband capacity and availability by:

State agencies, boards, commissions, and constitutional officers, including without limitation the Governor, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Division of Higher Education, and the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Private businesses, enterprises, and broadband providers;

Nonprofit organizations;

Governmental entities and organizations organized under federal law or the law of another state; and

Individuals and entities that seek to assist the state's efforts to improve economic development, elementary education, and secondary education through the use of broadband technology;

Gathering, compiling, and maintaining information obtained independently or from an individual or entity described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

Formulating, updating, and maintaining a state broadband plan; and

On or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, filing a written report of the activities and operations of the State Broadband Manager for the preceding six (6) months with the:

Governor;

Legislative Council; and

Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 792 substituted “The Governor shall designate” for “The Director of the Department of Information Systems is designated” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, §2380 deleted “Department of Higher Education” following “Department of Education” in (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, §§6292 and 6293 substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a); and substituted “the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Division of Higher Education, and the Arkansas Department of Transportation” for “Department of Education, Department of Higher Education, and Arkansas Department of Transportation” in (b)(1)(A).

Ark. L. Rev.

Justin C. Mankin, Comment: A Call for Competitive Broadband Reform in Arkansas, 68 Ark. L. Rev. 829 (2015).

(1)The Director of the Division of Information Systems shall select an individual to serve as the Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems and the Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems.

The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems shall:

Master data management may include without limitation a shared master citizen record;

Establish and promote data architecture management by developing an integrated set of specifications and documents that define the blueprint for managing data resources;

Provide data quality management by:

Applying data quality management concepts and practices that include without limitation:

Policies;

Measurement;

Process improvement; and

Education; and

Leveraging data warehouse, business intelligence, and master data management solutions;

Provide data governance by:

Exercising authority, control, and decision-making over the management of data assets; and

Introducing accountability for data asset management through formalized data stewardship;

Support open data exchanges based on standardized and published application programming interfaces that:

Facilitate standardized access to data within, between, or outside systems or state agencies; and

Establish a data catalog of data housed, maintained, and utilized by each state agency;

Utilize business intelligence that includes without limitation embedded business intelligence and advanced analytics that maximize the value of data in this state in order to facilitate access to and the analysis of data; and

Direct and oversee the Data and Transparency Panel.

The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems shall:

Activities that affect privacy may include without limitation complaints of privacy violations, implementation of the Privacy Act of 1974, 5 U.S.C. § 552(a), and internal controls.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” throughout (a) and in the introductory language of (b) and (c).

The Data and Transparency Panel is created within the Division of Information Systems.

The panel shall consist of the following members:

One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the Governor;

One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

One (1) appointee shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

Each appointee shall serve at the pleasure of his or her appointer.

The appointer of an appointee who vacates his or her position on the panel shall fill the vacancy as required under this section;

The Attorney General or his or her designee;

The secretaries, directors, or their designees, of the following entities:

The Arkansas Crime Information Center;

The Division of Arkansas State Police;

The Division of Career and Technical Education;

The Division of Community Correction;

The Division of Correction;

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

The Department of Finance and Administration;

The Department of Health;

The Division of Higher Education;

The Department of Human Services;

The Division of Information Systems;

The Department of Labor and Licensing;

The Division of Workforce Services; and

The Office of Skills Development;

(A)The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems.

The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems shall be the Chair of the Data and Transparency Panel.

The members of the panel shall select a vice chair annually;

The Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems; and

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or her designee.

The panel shall:

Help the leaders of this state and service providers develop an improved understanding of individual outcomes resulting from education and workforce pipelines in Arkansas;

Identify opportunities for improvement by using real-time information; and

Continuously align programs and resources to the evolving economy of this state.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 147 added (b)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a), (b)(3)(K), (b)(4)(A) and (B), (b)(5), and (c)(5); in the introductory language of (b)(3), inserted “secretaries” and substituted “entities” for “departments”; substituted “Division” for “Department” in (b)(3)(B), (D), (E), and (I); substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education” in (b)(3)(C); substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (b)(3)(F), and substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Department of Labor” in (b)(3)(L).

The 2019 amendment by No. 936 added “and offices” in the introductory language of (b)(3); added (b)(3)(M) and (b)(3)(N); and added (c)(7).

(1)The panel shall meet at least quarterly in each calendar year at a time and place determined by the panel.

Nine (9) members of the panel shall constitute a quorum to transact the business of the panel.

All records, reports, and other information obtained by the Data and Transparency Panel shall be confidential unless approved for publication in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the Division of Information Systems.

A person, agency, or entity that furnishes confidential information in good faith under this chapter is immune from criminal or civil liability arising out of the release of the confidential information.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (a).

Cross References. Board of Corrections, duties, §12-27-105.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the continuation and organization of the Department of Correction, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 1021, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 38, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-913.

Cross References. School Law, §6-10-101 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1987, No. 771, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, State laws relating to vocational and technical education changed significantly during the past six years;

“Whereas, a careful study of statutes affecting vocational and technical education reveals several conflicts among various sections, instances of legislation by inference rather than by specific provision, and inconsistency in terminology;

“Whereas, the Arkansas Statute Revision Commission is presenting to the 1987 General Assembly recommendations for recodifying the statutes; and

“Whereas, although the Commission members recognize the problems in vocational education, they believe that only the General Assembly has legal authority to resolve them;

“Now therefore….”

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 970, § 25, provided: “ESTABLISHMENT OF A ‘POSITION POOL’.

“(a)To address needs emerging from statewide education issues and the necessity of recruiting and retaining qualified personnel, the Arkansas Department of Education or its successor agency is authorized for the 2015-2016 fiscal year a pool of no more than five (5) Professional/Executive positions at a salary not to exceed the maximum salary for a grade N912. These positions are to be used by the Department of Education in the event that the personal services needs of the Department during the 2015-2016 fiscal year require additional positions, either by title or in number, that are not authorized by the General Assembly in Section 1 of this Act. These positions may also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not have a vacant position available with the appropriate title and salary level.

“(b)To address needs emerging from statewide education issues and the necessity of recruiting and retaining qualified personnel, the Arkansas Department of Education or its successor agency is authorized for the 2015-2016 fiscal year a pool of ten (10) classified positions at up to a grade C130. These positions are to be used by the Department of Education in the event that the personal services needs of the Department during the 2015-2016 fiscal year require additional positions, either by classification or in number, that are not authorized by the General Assembly in Section 1 of this Act. These positions may also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not have a vacant position available with the appropriate title and grade level.

“(c)Any salary determinations or adjustments administered under the provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be made by comparing the qualifications and salary levels of similar employees in school districts or in other state education agencies.

“(d)The Department of Education is authorized to access the pool positions authorized in this Section at any time when it is determined by the Commissioner that the need exists. The Commissioner shall provide a monthly report of the justification for the need to allocate titles from this growth pool to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council for review. The report shall also include an accounting of the names, titles, and salaries of personnel whose salaries have been adjusted under provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.

“(e)If the Department of Education requests continuation of any ‘Position Pool’ position(s) as established herein during the next fiscal year, the position(s) must be requested as a new position(s) in the agency's budget request.

“(f)Determining the number of personnel to be employed by a state agency is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximum number of personnel by identifying job titles and the maximum grade or salary attached to those titles. The General Assembly has determined that the Arkansas Department of Education could be operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that agency. That flexibility is being accomplished by providing a position pool in Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section and since the General Assembly has granted the agency broad powers under the growth pool concept, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the position pool by requiring review of the Legislative Council in the utilization of the position pool. Therefore, the requirement of review by the Legislative Council is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of review by the Legislative Council is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 230, § 23, provided: “ESTABLISHMENT OF A ‘POSITION POOL’.

“(a)To address needs emerging from statewide education issues and the necessity of recruiting and retaining qualified personnel, the Arkansas Department of Education or its successor agency is authorized for the 2016-2017 fiscal year a pool of no more than five (5) Professional/Executive positions at a salary not to exceed the maximum salary for a grade N912. These positions are to be used by the Department of Education in the event that the personal services needs of the Department during the 2016-2017 fiscal year require additional positions, either by title or in number, that are not authorized by the General Assembly in Section 1 of this Act. These positions may also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not have a vacant position available with the appropriate title and salary level.

“(b)To address needs emerging from statewide education issues and the necessity of recruiting and retaining qualified personnel, the Arkansas Department of Education or its successor agency is authorized for the 2016-2017 fiscal year a pool of ten (10) classified positions at up to a grade C130. These positions are to be used by the Department of Education in the event that the personal services needs of the Department during the 2016-2017 fiscal year require additional positions, either by classification or in number, that are not authorized by the General Assembly in Section 1 of this Act. These positions may also be used to properly classify positions when the Department does not have a vacant position available with the appropriate title and grade level.

“(c)Any salary determinations or adjustments administered under the provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be made by comparing the qualifications and salary levels of similar employees in school districts or in other state education agencies.

“(d)The Department of Education is authorized to access the pool positions authorized in this Section at any time when it is determined by the Commissioner that the need exists. The Commissioner shall provide a monthly report of the justification for the need to allocate titles from this growth pool to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council for review. The report shall also include an accounting of the names, titles, and salaries of personnel whose salaries have been adjusted under provisions of Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.

“(e)If the Department of Education requests continuation of any ‘Position Pool’ position(s) as established herein during the next fiscal year, the position(s) must be requested as a new position(s) in the agency's budget request.

“(f)Determining the number of personnel to be employed by a state agency is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximum number of personnel by identifying job titles and the maximum grade or salary attached to those titles. The General Assembly has determined that the Arkansas Department of Education could be operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that agency. That flexibility is being accomplished by providing a position pool in Subsections (a) and (b) of this Section and since the General Assembly has granted the agency broad powers under the growth pool concept, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the position pool by requiring review of the Legislative Council in the utilization of the position pool. Therefore, the requirement of review by the Legislative Council is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of review by the Legislative Council is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 64, § 6: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present laws, the responsibility for administering the various programs for vocational and technical education is vested in several different agencies; that the consolidation of such responsibility in a single agency would promote coordination of vocational and technical education programs and would be beneficial to the overall program for vocational and technical education in the state; that this Act is designed to accomplish this purpose and that it is essential to an orderly transition and consolidation of such programs and the administration thereof, that this Act become effective on July 1, 1981; that unless an emergency is declared, an extension of the 1981 regular session of the General Assembly could delay the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1981. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 929, § 37: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 771, § 17: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need to clarify the laws related to vocational and technical education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 773, § 14: Mar. 26, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the reconstructing of the delivery system of adult education and vocational education in this state is necessary to provide quality educational programs which are accessible by all segments of the population in this state; that recent studies have shown that in the year 2000, workers must have a minimum of fourteen (14) years education to function in the work force; that the state is in desperate need of training, retraining and upgrading the work force; that this act will provide a means to establish more institutions working closely with business, industry, labor and agriculture to provide every citizen with an opportunity to participate in vocational-technical training and associate degree programs within a reasonable driving distance of their homes; that it is necessary for this act to become effective immediately so needed changes can be implemented and comprehensive planning can begin. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1244, § 43: Apr. 17, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the restructuring of the delivery system of adult education and vocational education in this state is necessary to provide higher quality educational programs which are accessible by all segments of the population in this state; that recent studies have shown that in the year 2000, workers must have a minimum of fourteen (14) years education to function in the work force; that the state is in desperate need of training, retraining and upgrading the work force; that this act will provide a means to establish more institutions working closely with business and industry to provide every citizen with an opportunity to participate in vocational-technical training or college transfer programs within a reasonable driving distance of their homes; that it is necessary for this act to become effective immediately so needed changes can be made prior to the date the institutions contained herein are transferred to the new system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1246, § 17: Apr. 17, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 297, § 9: Feb. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the immediate effectiveness of this act is essential to the operation of the Department of Education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 1469, § 32: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is the state’s constitutional obligation to provide a general, suitable, and efficient free system of public schools in the state; that the public school funding distribution changes in this act are needed to ensure that proper funding is provided to the affected public schools and school districts; and that this act is immediately necessary so that the affected public schools and school districts will receive the amount of funding for the current school year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1403; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 4; 2001, No. 1722, § 3; 2007, No. 751, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 6262.